Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Chapter 4. Scenic Rivers Act.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

20 M. J. Waters and Watercourses, § 3.

§ 10.1-400.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Board”
means the Board of Conservation and Recreation.

“Department”
means the Department of Conservation and Recreation.

“Director”
means the Director of the Department of Conservation and Recreation.

“River”
means a flowing body of water, or a section or portion thereof.

“Scenic river”
means a river or section or portion of a river that has been designated a “scenic river” by an act of the General Assembly and that possesses superior natural and scenic beauty, fish and wildlife, and historic, recreational, geologic, cultural, and other assets.

“Virginia Scenic Rivers System”
means those rivers or sections of rivers designated as a scenic river by an act of the General Assembly.

History.

1970, c. 468, § 10-168; 1984, c. 739; 1985, c. 346; 1988, c. 891; 1989, c. 656; 2003, c. 240; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 240 added the definitions of “Board” and “Department”; inserted “and that possesses superior natural and scenic beauty, fish and wildlife, and historic, recreational, geologic, cultural, and other assets” in the definition of “Scenic river”; and substituted “Virginia Scenic Rivers System” for “Scenic Rivers System” in the last definition.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by cc. 803 and 835 are identical, and in cl. 93, substituted “the Board of Conservation and Recreation” for “the Virginia Scenic River Board” in the definition for “Board.”

Law Review.

For 2003/2004 survey of environmental law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 203 (2004).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Riparian landowners. —

The provisions of the Virginia Scenic Rivers Act do not apply to riparian landowners constructing dams, docks, or other structures that could impede water flow along tributaries of designated waterways unless those tributaries are included within the scope of the designation. The Scenic Rivers Act does not impose any restrictions on a riparian landowner’s management of surface water on his land abutting a designated waterway, and accordingly that a riparian landowner may engage in grading, plowing, timbering, or otherwise develop his property in a manner that might impede the flow of surface water across his property into a designated scenic river. See opinion of Attorney General to C. Eric Young, Esquire, Tazewell County Attorney, 17-037, 2017 Va. AG LEXIS 28 (12/7/17).

§ 10.1-401.
Powers and duties of Director; acquisition of property.

The Director shall have the duty to:

Identify rivers or sections of rivers, including their shores and natural environs, which should be considered for designation because of their scenic, recreational and historic attributes and natural beauty.

Conduct studies of rivers or sections of rivers to be considered for designation as wild, scenic or recreational rivers in cooperation with appropriate agencies of the Commonwealth and the United States.

Recommend to the Governor and to the General Assembly rivers or sections thereof to be considered for designation as scenic rivers.

Appoint Scenic River Advisory Committees or other local or regional committees of not less than three members to consider and manage scenic river interests and issues. The committees shall assist and advise the Director and the local governing body with the protection or management of the scenic river segment in their jurisdiction. The committees may consider and comment to the Director on any federal, state, or local governmental plans to approve, license, fund, or construct facilities that would alter any of the assets that qualified the river for scenic designation.

The Director is authorized to acquire in the name of the Commonwealth, either by gift or purchase, any real property or interest therein which the Director considers necessary or desirable for the protection of any scenic river, and may retain title to or transfer the property to other state agencies. The Director may not exercise the right of eminent domain in acquiring any such property or interest.

History.

1970, c. 468, §§ 10-167, 10-169, 10-170, 10-175; 1984, c. 739; 1985, c. 346; 1988, c. 891; 2003, c. 240.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 240 added subdivision A 4.

Law Review.

For note, “Public Regulation of Water Quality in Virginia,” see 13 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 424 (1971).

For article assessing the adequacy of Virginia’s water policy, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 312 (1972).

For article on stream flow maintenance in Virginia, see 18 U. Rich. L. Rev. 485 (1984).

§ 10.1-402.
Development of water and related resources and evaluation as scenic resource.

The Department may review and make recommendations regarding all planning for the use and development of water and related land resources including the construction of impoundments, diversions, roadways, crossings, channels, locks, canals, or other uses that change the character of a stream or waterway or destroy its scenic assets, so that full consideration and evaluation of the river as a scenic resource will be given before alternative plans for use and development are approved. To effectuate the purposes of this section, all state and local agencies shall consider the recommendations of the Department.

History.

1970, c. 468, § 10-167; 1988, c. 891; 2003, c. 240.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 240, in the first sentence, deleted “or administering agency” following “Department,” substituted “that” for “which” following “other uses,” and substituted “assets” for “values” following “scenic”; and deleted “or administering agency” at the end of the last sentence.

§ 10.1-403.
Hearing.

Prior to submitting recommendations to the Governor and the General Assembly, the Director shall upon request of any interested state agency or political subdivision, or upon his own motion, hold a public hearing on a proposal to designate a scenic river.

History.

1970, c. 468, § 10-172; 1984, c. 739; 1985, c. 346; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-404.
Recommendation that a river be designated a scenic river.

A recommendation to the Governor and General Assembly that a river or section thereof be designated a scenic river shall be submitted with:

The views and recommendations of the State Water Control Board and other affected agencies; and

A report showing the proposed area and classification, the characteristics which qualify the river or section of river for designation, the general ownership and land use in the area, and the estimated costs of acquisition and administration in the Scenic Rivers System.

History.

1970, c. 468, § 10-171; 1984, cc. 739, 750; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-405.
Duties and powers of the Department; eminent domain prohibited.

The Department shall:

Administer the Virginia Scenic Rivers System to preserve and protect its natural beauty and to assure its use and enjoyment for its scenic, recreational, geologic, fish and wildlife, historic, cultural or other assets and to encourage the continuance of existing agricultural, horticultural, forestry and open space land and water uses.

Periodically survey each scenic river and its immediate environs and monitor all existing and proposed uses of each scenic river and its related land resources.

Assist local governments in solving problems associated with the Virginia Scenic Rivers System, in consultation with the Director, the Board, and the advisory committees.

The Department shall not exercise the right of eminent domain to acquire any real property or interest therein for the purpose of providing additional access to any scenic river. Nothing in this subsection shall limit or modify any powers granted otherwise to any locality.

The Department may seek assistance and advice related to the scenic river program from the Department of Wildlife Resources, the Department of Forestry, the Department of Historic Resources, the Virginia Marine Resources Commission, the United States Forest Service, other state and federal agencies and instrumentalities, and affected local governing bodies.

The Department shall have the following powers, which may be delegated by the Director:

To make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its scenic river duties and the execution of its scenic river powers, including but not limited to contracts with private nonprofit organizations, the United States, other state agencies and political subdivisions of the Commonwealth;

To accept bequests and gifts of real and personal property as well as endowments, funds, and grants from the United States government, its agencies and instrumentalities, and any other source. To these ends, the Department shall have the power to comply with such conditions and execute such agreements as may be necessary, convenient, or desirable; and

To conduct fund-raising activities as deemed appropriate related to scenic river issues.

History.

1970, c. 468, §§ 10-167, 10-173; 1988, c. 891; 2003, c. 240; 2020, c. 958.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, c. 240, cl. 3 provides: “That the Department of Conservation and Recreation shall submit a report to the Governor and the General Assembly in 2009, no later than November 1, that evaluates the effectiveness of the Virginia Scenic River Board. The Department shall examine the activities of the Board, determine whether the Board should be continued, abolished, or modified, and recommend other improvements for the administration of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System. The report shall be submitted as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 240 substituted “Department” for “agency designated by the General Assembly” in the introductory language of subsection A; in subdivision A 1, substituted “Virginia Scenic Rivers System” for “scenic river or section thereof” and “assets” for “values”; in subdivision A 2, substituted “each” for “the” in two places and inserted “its” preceding “related”; in subdivision A 3, substituted “Virginia Scenic Rivers System” for “scenic river,” inserted “the Board,” and substituted “advisory committees” for “Advisory Board”; in subsection B, substituted “Department” for “administering agency” and “any scenic” for “the”; and added subsections C and D.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958, substituted “Department of Wildlife Resources” for “Department of Game and Inland Fisheries” in subsection C.

§ 10.1-406.
Repealed by Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 94.

Editor’s note.

Former §

10.1-406

, pertaining to the Virginia Scenic River Board, derived from 1970, c. 468, § 10-170; 1984, c. 739; 1985, c. 346; 1988, c. 891; 2003, c. 240.

§ 10.1-406.1.
Powers of local governments.

In consultation with the Director, local governments shall have the authority, where a committee has not been established pursuant to subdivision A 4 of §

10.1-401

, to appoint a local scenic river advisory committee to advise the local government and the Director in administering that section of designated scenic river within the local government’s jurisdiction. The committees shall assist and advise the Director and the local governing body on the protection or management of the scenic river segment in their jurisdiction. The committees may consider and comment to the Director on any federal, state or local governmental plans to approve, license, fund or construct facilities that would alter any of the assets that qualified the river for scenic designation.

History.

2003, c. 240.

§ 10.1-407.
Act of General Assembly required to construct, etc., dam or other structure.

As used in this chapter, “dam or other structure” means any structure extending from bank to bank of a river that will interfere with the normal movement of waterborne traffic, interfere with the normal movement of fish or wildlife, raise the water level on the upstream side of the structure, or lower the water level on the downstream side of the structure.

After designation of any river or section of river as a scenic river by the General Assembly, no dam or other structure impeding the natural flow thereof shall be constructed, operated, or maintained in such river or section of river unless specifically authorized by an act of the General Assembly.

No new dam or other structure or enlargement of an existing dam or other structure that impedes the natural flow of Goose Creek shall be constructed, operated, or maintained within the section of Goose Creek designated as a scenic river by §

10.1-411

unless specifically authorized by an act of the General Assembly.

History.

1970, c. 468, § 10-174; 1988, c. 891; 2018, c. 273.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 added subsections A and C and made related changes.

Law Review.

For article on siting electric power facilities, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 257 (1972).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Riparian landowners. —

The provisions of the Virginia Scenic Rivers Act do not apply to riparian landowners constructing dams, docks, or other structures that could impede water flow along tributaries of designated waterways unless those tributaries are included within the scope of the designation. The Scenic Rivers Act does not impose any restrictions on a riparian landowner’s management of surface water on his land abutting a designated waterway, and accordingly that a riparian landowner may engage in grading, plowing, timbering, or otherwise develop his property in a manner that might impede the flow of surface water across his property into a designated scenic river. See opinion of Attorney General to C. Eric Young, Esquire, Tazewell County Attorney, 17-037, 2017 Va. AG LEXIS 28 (12/7/17).

§ 10.1-408.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Uses not affected by scenic river designation.

Except as provided in §

10.1-407

, all riparian land and water uses along or in the designated section of a river that are permitted by law shall not be restricted by this chapter.

Designation as a scenic river shall not be used:

To designate the lands along the river and its tributaries as unsuitable for mining pursuant to §

45.2-1028

or regulations promulgated with respect to such section, or as unsuitable for use as a location for a surface mineral mine as defined in §

45.2-1101

; however, the Department shall still be permitted to exercise the powers granted under §

10.1-402

; or

To be a criterion for purposes of imposing water quality standards under the federal Clean Water Act.

Nothing in this chapter shall preclude the federal government, the Commonwealth, or a locality or local governing body from using, constructing, reconstructing, replacing, repairing, operating, or performing necessary maintenance on any road or bridge.

Nothing in §

10.1-414

or

10.1-418.6

shall preclude the Commonwealth or a local governing body or authority from constructing, reconstructing, operating, or performing necessary maintenance on any transportation or public water supply project.

Nothing in this chapter shall preclude the continued:

Use, operation, and maintenance of the existing Loudoun County Sanitation Authority water impoundment or the installation of new water intake facilities in the existing reservoir located within the section of Goose Creek designated by §

10.1-411

;

Operation and maintenance of existing dams in the section of the Rappahannock River designated by §

10.1-415

;

Operation, maintenance, alteration, expansion, or destruction by the City of Fredericksburg of the old VEPCO canal or any other part of the city’s waterworks; or

Operation and maintenance of existing dams in the section of the Clinch River designated by §

10.1-410.2

.

The City of Richmond shall be allowed to reconstruct, operate, and maintain existing facilities at the Byrd Park and Hollywood Hydroelectric Power Stations at current capacity. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent the Commonwealth, the City of Richmond, or any common carrier railroad from constructing or reconstructing floodwalls or public common carrier facilities that may traverse the section of the James River designated by §

10.1-412

, such as road or railroad bridges, raw water intake structures, or water or sewer lines that would be constructed below water level.

The owner of the Harvell Dam in the City of Petersburg may construct, reconstruct, operate, and maintain the Harvell Dam subject to other law and regulation.

Nothing in this chapter shall preclude the Commonwealth, the City of Fredericksburg, or the County of Stafford, Spotsylvania, or Culpeper from constructing any new raw water intake structures or devices, including pipes and reservoirs but not dams, or laying water or sewer lines below water level.

Nothing in this chapter shall:

Preclude the construction, operation, repair, maintenance, or replacement of (i) a natural gas pipeline for which the State Corporation Commission has issued a certificate of public convenience and necessity or any connections with such pipeline owned by the Richmond Gas Utility and connected to such pipeline or (ii) the natural gas pipeline, case number PUE 860065, for which the State Corporation Commission has issued a certificate of public convenience and necessity; or

Be construed to prevent the construction, use, operation, and maintenance of a natural gas pipeline (i) traversing the portion of the river designated by §

10.1-411.1

at, or at any point north of, the existing power line that is located approximately 200 feet north of the northern entrance to the Swede Tunnel or (ii) on or beneath the two existing railroad trestles, one located just south of the Swede Tunnel and the other located just north of the confluence of the Guest River with the Clinch River, or to prevent the use, operation, and maintenance of such railroad trestles in furtherance of the construction, operation, use, and maintenance of such pipeline.

History.

1988, c. 891; 2014, c. 823; 2018, c. 273; 2020, cc. 306, 629.

Editor’s note.

Effective October 1, 2021, “§

45.2-1028

” was substituted for “§ 45.1-252” and “§

45.2-1101

” was substituted for “§ 45.1-161.292:2” to conform to the recodification of Title 45.1 by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 823 designated the existing paragraph as A and added subsection B.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 substituted “that” for “which” in subsection A; and added subsections C through I.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 306 and 629 are identical, and added subdivision E 4; in subsection H, deleted “(i) the continued operation and maintenance of existing dams in the section of the Rappahannock River designated by §

10.1-415

or (ii)” following “preclude”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 175 inserted “10.1-413” in subsection D; in subsection H, deleted “the County of Stafford, Spotsylvania, or” preceding “Culpeper” and inserted “Spotsylvania, or Stafford County” following “Culpeper”; added subdivision I 3; and made stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendment by c. 235 rewrote subdivision E 3, which read: “Operation, maintenance, alteration, expansion, or destruction of the Embrey Dam or its appurtenances by the City of Fredericksburg, including the old VEPCO canal and the existing City Reservoir behind the Embrey Dam, or any other part of the City’s waterworks.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Riparian landowners. —

The provisions of the Virginia Scenic Rivers Act do not apply to riparian landowners constructing dams, docks, or other structures that could impede water flow along tributaries of designated waterways unless those tributaries are included within the scope of the designation. The Scenic Rivers Act does not impose any restrictions on a riparian landowner’s management of surface water on his land abutting a designated waterway, and accordingly that a riparian landowner may engage in grading, plowing, timbering, or otherwise develop his property in a manner that might impede the flow of surface water across his property into a designated scenic river. See opinion of Attorney General to C. Eric Young, Esquire, Tazewell County Attorney, 17-037, 2017 Va. AG LEXIS 28 (12/7/17).

§ 10.1-408.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Uses not affected by scenic river designation.

Except as provided in §

10.1-407

, all riparian land and water uses along or in the designated section of a river that are permitted by law shall not be restricted by this chapter.

Designation as a scenic river shall not be used:

To designate the lands along the river and its tributaries as unsuitable for mining pursuant to §

45.2-1028

or regulations promulgated with respect to such section, or as unsuitable for use as a location for a surface mineral mine as defined in §

45.2-1101

; however, the Department shall still be permitted to exercise the powers granted under §

10.1-402

; or

To be a criterion for purposes of imposing water quality standards under the federal Clean Water Act.

Nothing in this chapter shall preclude the federal government, the Commonwealth, or a locality or local governing body from using, constructing, reconstructing, replacing, repairing, operating, or performing necessary maintenance on any road or bridge.

Nothing in §

10.1-413

,

10.1-414

, or

10.1-418.6

shall preclude the Commonwealth or a local governing body or authority from constructing, reconstructing, operating, or performing necessary maintenance on any transportation or public water supply project.

Nothing in this chapter shall preclude the continued:

Use, operation, and maintenance of the existing Loudoun County Sanitation Authority water impoundment or the installation of new water intake facilities in the existing reservoir located within the section of Goose Creek designated by §

10.1-411

;

Operation and maintenance of existing dams in the section of the Rappahannock River designated by §

10.1-415

;

Operation, maintenance, alteration, expansion, or destruction by the City of Fredericksburg of the old VEPCO canal or any other part of the city’s waterworks; or

Operation and maintenance of existing dams in the section of the Clinch River designated by §

10.1-410.2

.

The City of Richmond shall be allowed to reconstruct, operate, and maintain existing facilities at the Byrd Park and Hollywood Hydroelectric Power Stations at current capacity. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent the Commonwealth, the City of Richmond, or any common carrier railroad from constructing or reconstructing floodwalls or public common carrier facilities that may traverse the section of the James River designated by §

10.1-412

, such as road or railroad bridges, raw water intake structures, or water or sewer lines that would be constructed below water level.

The owner of the Harvell Dam in the City of Petersburg may construct, reconstruct, operate, and maintain the Harvell Dam subject to other law and regulation.

Nothing in this chapter shall preclude the Commonwealth, the City of Fredericksburg, or Culpeper, Spotsylvania, or Stafford County from constructing any new raw water intake structures or devices, including pipes and reservoirs but not dams, or laying water or sewer lines below water level.

Nothing in this chapter shall:

Preclude the construction, operation, repair, maintenance, or replacement of (i) a natural gas pipeline for which the State Corporation Commission has issued a certificate of public convenience and necessity or any connections with such pipeline owned by the Richmond Gas Utility and connected to such pipeline or (ii) the natural gas pipeline, case number PUE 860065, for which the State Corporation Commission has issued a certificate of public convenience and necessity;

Be construed to prevent the construction, use, operation, and maintenance of a natural gas pipeline (i) traversing the portion of the river designated by §

10.1-411.1

at, or at any point north of, the existing power line that is located approximately 200 feet north of the northern entrance to the Swede Tunnel or (ii) on or beneath the two existing railroad trestles, one located just south of the Swede Tunnel and the other located just north of the confluence of the Guest River with the Clinch River, or to prevent the use, operation, and maintenance of such railroad trestles in furtherance of the construction, operation, use, and maintenance of such pipeline; or

Preclude the construction, use, operation, maintenance, replacement, or removal of any asset owned or operated by an entity organized pursuant to Chapter 9.1 (§ 56-231.15 et seq.) of Title 56 traversing the portion of the river designated by §

10.1-413

at or any point between the confluence of Allen’s Creek and the James River and the confluence of David Creek and the James River.

History.

1988, c. 891; 2014, c. 823; 2018, c. 273; 2020, cc. 306, 629; 2022, cc. 175, 235.

§ 10.1-409.
Appomattox State Scenic River.

The Appomattox River, 100 feet from the base of the Brasfield Dam, excluding the Port Walthall Channel of the River, to the confluence with the James River, a distance of approximately 19.2 miles, is hereby designated as the Appomattox State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

1984, c. 739, § 10-173.4; 1985, cc. 346, 448; 1988, c. 891; 1998, cc. 82, 167; 2003, c. 240; 2011, c. 276; 2018, c. 273.

The 1998 amendments.

The 1998 amendments by cc. 82 and 167, are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “100 feet from the base of the Lake Chesdin Dam” for “from the abutment dam located approximately 1.3 miles downstream from Lake Chesdin” and substituted “6.2 miles” for “five miles.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 240 deleted the subsection A designation; and deleted former subsections B and C, which read: “B. The Department of Game and Inland Fisheries is designated to administer the Appomattox State Scenic River in accordance with this section. C. The Governor, in consultation with the Director and affected local governing bodies, shall appoint the Appomattox State Scenic River Advisory Board, which shall be composed of at least three riparian landowners within the designated section and other local residents.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 276, substituted “Brasfield Dam, excluding the Port Walthall Channel of the River, to the confluence with the James River, a distance of approximately 19.2 miles” for “Lake Chesdin Dam, to the Route 36 bridge crossing in the City of Petersburg, a distance of approximately 6.2 miles” in the first sentence and added the second paragraph.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 inserted “as the Appomattox State Scenic River” in the first paragraph; and deleted the former second paragraph, which read “Nothing in this section shall preclude the Commonwealth or a local governing body from constructing, reconstructing, operating, or performing necessary maintenance on any road or bridge project. The owner of the Harvell Dam in the City of Petersburg may construct, reconstruct, operate, and maintain the Harvell Dam subject to other law and regulation.”

§ 10.1-410.
Catoctin Creek State Scenic River.

The Catoctin Creek from bank to bank in Loudoun County from Waterford to its junction with the Potomac River, a distance of approximately 16 river miles, is hereby designated as the Catoctin Creek State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

1984, c. 739, § 10-173.3; 1985, cc. 346, 448; 1988, c. 891; 2003, c. 240; 2018, c. 273.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “Town of” was deleted preceding “Waterford” to correct an error in the 2018 act.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 240 substituted “16” for “sixteen” in subsection A; deleted former subsections B and C, concerning administration by the Northern Virginia Regional Park Authority and appointments to the Catoctin Creek State Scenic River Advisory Board; redesignated former subsection D as present subsection B; and substituted “that” for “which” following “Catoctin Creek” in the second paragraph of present subsection B.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 inserted “as the Catoctin Creek State Scenic River”; and deleted former subsection B, which defined and prohibited “dams or other structures” on Catoctin Creek.

§ 10.1-410.1.
Chickahominy State Scenic River.

The main channel of the Chickahominy River from the Mechanicsville Turnpike (Route 360) eastward until the terminus of the Henrico County/Hanover County border, is hereby designated as the Chickahominy State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

1990, c. 173; 2003, c. 240; 2018, c. 273.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 240 deleted former subsections B and C, regarding administration by the Department of Conservation and Recreation and appointments to the Chickahominy Scenic River Advisory Board; and redesignated former subsections D and E as present subsections B and C.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 inserted “as the Chickahominy State Scenic River”; and deleted former subsections B and C, pertaining to construction of bridges and highways, and natural gas pipelines, respectively.

§ 10.1-410.2.
Clinch State Scenic River.

The Clinch River in Tazewell and Russell Counties from its confluence with Indian Creek in Cedar Bluff to the Russell-Scott county line, a distance of approximately 66.8 miles and including its tributary, Big Cedar Creek from river mile 5.8 near Lebanon to the confluence, is hereby designated as the Clinch State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

1992, c. 308; 1994, c. 329; 2003, c. 240; 2014, c. 823; 2018, c. 273; 2020, cc. 306, 629.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 240 substituted “20” for “twenty” in subsection A; deleted former subsections B and C, concerning administration by the Department of Conservation and Recreation and appointments to the Clinch Scenic River Advisory Board; redesignated former subsection D as present subsection B; and deleted “of Conservation and Recreation” following “Department” in present subsection B 1.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 823 deleted the A designation from the first paragraph and deleted subsection B which stated that this designation shall not be used to designate as unsuitable for mining and as a criterion for imposing water quality standards.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 inserted “as the Clinch State Scenic River.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 306 and 629 are identical, and rewrote the section, which had read, “The Clinch River in Russell County from its confluence with the Little River to the Nash Ford Bridge at mile 279.5, a distance of approximately 20 miles and including its tributary, Big Cedar Creek from the confluence to mile 5.8 near Lebanon, is hereby designated as the Clinch State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.”

§ 10.1-411.
Goose Creek State Scenic River.

Goose Creek, from bank to bank in Fauquier and Loudoun Counties from the confluence of the North and South Prongs of Goose Creek approximately 0.22 mile downstream of the crossing of the Appalachian Trail in Fauquier County to its junction with the Potomac River in Loudoun County, a distance of approximately 48 river miles, is hereby designated as the Goose Creek State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

1984, c. 739, § 10-173.2; 1985, cc. 346, 448; 1988, c. 891; 2003, c. 240; 2007, c. 650; 2018, c. 273.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 240 substituted “28” for “twenty-eight” in subsection A; deleted former subsections B through D, concerning administration by the Northern Virginia Regional Park Authority, appointments to the Goose Creek Scenic River Advisory Board, and the Advisory Board; redesignated former subsections D through G as present subsections B through D; in present subsection B, twice inserted “Northern Virginia Regional Park” preceding “Authority,” and substituted “that” for “which” following “therein”; and in present subsection C, substituted “Scenic River” for “scenic river,” and substituted “that” for “which” following “Goose Creek.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 650, in subsection A, substituted “Fauquier and Loudoun Counties” for “Loudoun County,” “confluence of the North and South Prongs of Goose Creek approximately 0.22 mile downstream of the crossing of the Appalachian Trail in Fauquier County” for “Loudoun Fauquier County line” and “48” for “28” and inserted “in Loudoun County.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 inserted “as the Goose Creek State Scenic River”; and deleted former subsections B through D, pertaining to Northern Virginia Regional Park Authority’s authority to acquire property, prohibition of building new dams or other structures, and the use, etc., of the Fairfax City water impoundment, respectively.

§ 10.1-411.1.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Clinch-Guest State Scenic River.

The Clinch River from the Route 58 bridge in St. Paul to the junction with the Guest River, a distance of approximately 9.2 miles, and a segment of the Guest River in Wise County, from a point 100 feet downstream from the Route 72 bridge to its confluence with the Clinch River, a distance of approximately 6.5 miles, are hereby designated as the Clinch-Guest State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

1990, c. 397; 1991, c. 487; 2002, c. 251; 2003, c. 240; 2018, c. 273.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 251 inserted “Clinch River from the Route 58 bridge in St. Paul to the junction with the Guest River, a distance of approximately 9.2 miles, and a segment of the” and substituted “6.5 miles, are hereby” for “6.5 miles, is hereby” in subsection A; inserted “Clinch-” preceding “Guest State Scenic River” in subsection B; and in subsection C, substituted “Clinch-Guest Scenic River” for “Guest Scenic River,” substituted “nine” for “seven,” and substituted “landowner on the Clinch River and at least one riparian landowner from” for “landowner, from.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 240 deleted former subsections B and C, concerning administration by the Department of Conservation and Recreation and appointments to the Clinch-Guest Scenic River Advisory Board; redesignated former subsections D and E as present subsections B and C; and substituted “that” for “which” in the last sentence of present subsection B.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 inserted “as the Clinch-Guest State Scenic River” and deleted “however, this description shall not be construed as making the lands along such river unsuitable for underground mining pursuant to § 45.1-252 or regulations promulgated thereunder” at the end; deleted former subsections B and C, pertaining to construction, etc. of natural gas pipelines, and construction, etc., of public roads or bridges, respectively.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 235 deleted “Clinch River from the Route 58 bridge in St. Paul to the junction with the Guest River, a distance of approximately 9.2 miles, and a segment of the” preceding “Guest River in Wise County”; and substituted “is” for “are” and “Guest State Scenic River” for “Clinch-Guest State Scenic River.”

§ 10.1-411.1.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Guest State Scenic River.

The Guest River in Wise County, from a point 100 feet downstream from the Route 72 bridge to its confluence with the Clinch River, a distance of approximately 6.5 miles, is hereby designated as the Guest State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

1990, c. 397; 1991, c. 487; 2002, c. 251; 2003, c. 240; 2018, c. 273; 2022, c. 235.

§ 10.1-411.2.
Russell Fork State Scenic River.

The Russell Fork River from the Splashdam railroad crossing to the Kentucky state line, a distance of nine miles in Dickenson County, is hereby designated as the Russell Fork State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

2010, c. 290; 2014, c. 823; 2018, c. 273.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 823 deleted subsection B which stated that this designation shall not be used to designate as unsuitable for mining and as a criterion for imposing water quality standards.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 inserted “as the Russell Fork State Scenic River”; and deleted former subsection B, which read “Nothing in this chapter shall preclude the construction or reconstruction of any road or bridge by the Commonwealth or by any county, city, or town.”

§ 10.1-411.3.
Banister State Scenic River.

The Banister River from the Route 29 bridge in Pittsylvania County to the confluence with the Dan River in Halifax County, a distance of approximately 63.3 miles, is hereby designated as the Banister State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

2013, c. 352; 2014, c. 149; 2018, c. 273.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 149, in subsection A, substituted “29” for “640” and “63.3” for “38.4.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 inserted “as the Banister State Scenic River”; and deleted former subsection B, which read “Nothing in this section shall preclude the Commonwealth or a local governing body from constructing, reconstructing, or performing necessary maintenance on any road or bridge.”

§ 10.1-411.4.
Cranesnest State Scenic River.

The Cranesnest River from Route 637 to the Flanagan Reservoir Cranesnest Launch Ramp in Dickenson County, a distance of approximately 10.7 miles, is hereby designated as the Cranesnest State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

2014, c. 823; 2018, c. 273.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 inserted “as the Cranesnest State Scenic River”; and deleted former subsection B, which read “Nothing in this section shall preclude the Commonwealth or a local governing body from constructing, reconstructing, or performing necessary maintenance on any road or bridge.”

§ 10.1-411.5.
Pound State Scenic River.

The Pound River in Wise and Dickenson Counties, from the northern boundary of the Town of Pound near Old Mill Village Road northeastward to the Pound River Campground at Little Laurel Branch in Dickenson County, a distance of approximately 17 miles, is hereby designated as the Pound State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

2020, cc. 316.

§ 10.1-411.6.
Grays Creek State Scenic River.

Grays Creek in Surry County from Southwark Road (Route 618) to its confluence with the James River, a distance of approximately six miles, is hereby designated as the Grays Creek State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

2020, cc. 322, 457.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in Acts 2020, cc. 322 and 457 having been §

10.1-411.5

.